Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIV Descent, Wills, and Administration of Decedents’ Estates
Disposition of Community Property Rights at Death

391.210.
Application.

KRS

391.210

to

391.260

applies to the disposition at death of the following property acquired by a married person:

All personal property, wherever situated:

Which was acquired as or became, and remained, community property under the laws of another jurisdiction; or

All or the proportionate part of that property acquired with the rents, issues, or income of, or the proceeds from, or in exchange for, that community property; or

Traceable to that community property;

All or the proportionate part of any real property situated in this state which was acquired with the rents, issues or income of, the proceeds from, or in exchange for, property acquired as or which became, and remained, community property under the laws of another jurisdiction, or property traceable to that community property.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 328, § 1(1).

Research References and Practice Aids

Comparative Legislation.

Uniform Disposition of Community Property Rights at Death Act.

Va.

Code 1950. §§ 64-1-197 — 64-1-206.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Comments, The Uniform Disposition of Community Property Rights at Death Act, 65 Ky. L.J. 541 (1976-77).

391.215.
Rebuttable presumptions.

In determining whether KRS

391.210

to

391.260

applies to specific property the following rebuttable presumptions apply:

Property acquired during marriage by a spouse of that marriage while domiciled in a jurisdiction under whose laws property could then be acquired as community property is presumed to have been acquired as or to have become, and remained, property to which KRS

391.210

to

391.260

applies; and

Real property situated in this Commonwealth and personal property wherever situated acquired by a married person while domiciled in a jurisdiction under whose laws property could not then be acquired as community property, title to which was taken in a form which created rights of survivorship, is presumed not to be property to which KRS

391.210

to

391.260

applies.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 328, § 1(2).

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Comments, The Uniform Disposition of Community Property Rights at Death Act, 65 Ky. L.J. 541 (1976-77).

391.220.
Disposition upon death.

Upon death of a married person, one-half (1/2) of the property to which KRS

391.210

to

391.260

applies is the property of the surviving spouse and is not subject to testamentary disposition by the decedent or distribution under the laws of succession of this Commonwealth. One-half (1/2) of that property is the property of the decedent and is subject to testamentary disposition or distribution under the laws of succession of this Commonwealth. With respect to property to which KRS

391.210

to

391.260

applies, the one-half (1/2) of the property which is the property of the decedent is not subject to the surviving spouse’s right to elect against the will.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 328, § 1(3).

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Comments, The Uniform Disposition of Community Property Rights at Death Act, 65 Ky. L.J. 541 (1976-77).

391.225.
Perfection of title of surviving spouse.

If the title to any property to which KRS

391.210

to

391.260

applies was held by the decedent at the time of death, title of the surviving spouse may be perfected by an order of the probate court or by execution of an instrument by the personal representative or the heirs or devisees of the decedent with the approval of the probate court. Neither the personal representative nor the court in which the decedent’s estate is being administered has a duty to discover or attempt to discover whether property held by the decedent is property to which KRS

391.210

to

391.260

applies, unless a written demand is made by the surviving spouse or the spouse’s successor in interest.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 328, § 1(4).

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Comments, The Uniform Disposition of Community Property Rights at Death Act, 65 Ky. L.J. 541 (1976-77).

391.230.
Perfection of title of personal representative, heir, or devisee.

If the title to any property to which KRS

391.210

to

391.260

applies is held by the surviving spouse at the time of the decedent’s death, the personal representative or an heir or devisee of the decedent may institute an action to perfect title to the property. The personal representative has no fiduciary duty to discover or attempt to discover whether any property held by the surviving spouse is property to which KRS

391.210

to

391.260

applies, unless a written demand is made by an heir, devisee, or creditor of the decedent.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 328, § 1(5).

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Comments, The Uniform Disposition of Community Property Rights at Death Act, 65 Ky. L.J. 541 (1976-77).

391.235.
Purchaser for value or lender.

If a surviving spouse has apparent title to property to which KRS

391.210

to

391.260

applies, a purchaser for value or a lender taking a security interest in the property takes his interest in the property free of any rights of the personal representative or an heir or devisee of the decedent. If a personal representative or an heir or devisee of the decedent has apparent title to property to which KRS

391.210

to

391.260

applies, a purchaser for value or a lender taking a security interest in the property takes his interest in the property free of any rights of the surviving spouse. A purchaser for value or a lender need not inquire whether a vendor or borrower acted properly. The proceeds of a sale or creation of a security interest shall be treated in the same manner as the property transferred to the purchaser for value or a lender.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 328, § 1(6).

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Comments, The Uniform Disposition of Community Property Rights at Death Act, 65 Ky. L.J. 541 (1976-77).

391.240.
Creditors’ rights.

KRS

391.210

to

391.260

does not affect rights of creditors with respect to property to which KRS

391.210

to

391.260

applies.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 328, § 1(7).

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Comments, The Uniform Disposition of Community Property Rights at Death Act, 65 Ky. L.J. 541 (1976-77).

391.245.
Acts of married persons.

KRS

391.210

to

391.260

does not prevent married persons from severing or altering their interests in property to which KRS

391.210

to

391.260

applies.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 328, § 1(8).

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Comments, The Uniform Disposition of Community Property Rights at Death Act, 65 Ky. L.J. 541 (1976-77).

391.250.
Limitations on testamentary disposition.

KRS

391.210

to

391.260

does not authorize a person to dispose of property by will if it is held under limitations imposed by law preventing testamentary disposition by that person.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 328, § 1(9).

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Comments, The Uniform Disposition of Community Property Rights at Death Act, 65 Ky. L.J. 541 (1976-77).

391.255.
Uniformity of application and construction.

KRS

391.210

to

391.260

shall be so applied and construed as to effectuate the general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of KRS

391.210

to

391.260

among those states which enact it.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 328, § 1(10).

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Comments, The Uniform Disposition of Community Property Rights at Death Act, 65 Ky. L.J. 541 (1976-77).

391.260.
Title.

KRS

391.210

to

391.260

may be cited as the Uniform Disposition of Community Property Rights at Death Act.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 328, § 1(11).

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Comments, The Uniform Disposition of Community Property Rights at Death Act, 65 Ky. L.J. 541 (1976-77).